Utah statutes.
58-17b-613.   Patient counseling.
(1)  Every pharmacy facility shall orally offer to counsel a patient or a
patient's agent in a personal face-to-face discussion with respect to each
prescription drug dispensed, if the patient or patient's agent:
(a)  delivers the prescription in person to the pharmacist or pharmacy intern;
or
(b)  receives the drug in person at the time it is dispensed at the pharmacy
facility.
(2)  A pharmacist or pharmacy intern shall provide counseling to each patient,
and shall provide the patient with a toll-free telephone number by which the
patient may contact a pharmacist at the dispensing pharmacy during normal
business hours and receive oral counseling, with respect to each prescription
drug dispensed if the patient provides or the prescription is otherwise
provided to the pharmacy facility by a means other than personal delivery, and
the dispensed prescription drug is mailed or otherwise delivered to the
patient outside of the pharmacy facility.
(3) (a)  The provisions of Subsections (1) and (2) do not apply to
incarcerated patients or persons otherwise under the jurisdiction of the Utah
Department of Corrections or a county detention facility.
(b)  A written communication with a person described in Subsection (3)(a)
shall  be used by a pharmacist or pharmacy intern in lieu of a face to face or
telephonic communication for the purpose of counseling the patient.
